Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) For purposes of this chapter, "wholesale sale," "sale at wholesale," "retail sale," and "sale at retail" do not include the sale of precious metal bullion or monetized bullion.(2) In computing tax under this chapter on the business of making sales of precious metal bullion or monetized bullion, the tax must be imposed on the amounts received as commissions upon transactions for the accounts of customers over and above the amount paid to other dealers associated in such transactions, but no deduction or offset is allowed on account of salaries or commissions paid to salesmen or other employees.(3) For purposes of this section:(a) "Monetized bullion" means coins or other forms of money manufactured from gold, silver, or other metals and heretofore, now, or hereafter used as a medium of exchange under the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign nation, but does not include coins or money sold to be manufactured into jewelry or works of art.(b) "Precious metal bullion" means any precious metal which has been put through a process of smelting or refining including, but not limited to, gold, silver, platinum, rhodium, and palladium, and which is in such state or condition that its value depends primarily upon its contents and not upon its form.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---